Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2141
Appeal from condemnation or disconnection order; time; stay of appeal; conditions.

(1) Any person aggrieved by a condemnation or disconnection order issued may appeal from the order by filing a written notice of appeal with the board within ten days after the date the order was served upon the owner or within ten days after the order was filed with the board, whichever is later.

(2) Upon receipt of the notice of appeal from a condemnation or disconnection order because the electrical installation is proximately dangerous to health and property, the order appealed from shall not be stayed unless countermanded by the board.

(3) Upon receipt of notice of appeal from a condemnation or disconnection order because the electrical installation is not in compliance with accepted standards of construction for safety to health and property, the order appealed from shall be stayed until final decision of the board and the board shall notify the property owner and the Class B electrical contractor, electrical contractor, Class A master electrician, fire alarm installer, or special electrician making the installation. The power supplier shall also be notified in those instances in which the order has been served on such supplier.

Laws 1975, LB 525, § 41;

Laws 1978, LB 833, § 15;

R.S.Supp.,1980, § 81-5,111;

Laws 1993, LB 193, § 32;

Laws 2003, LB 126, § 14;

Laws 2024, LB144, § 14.
July 19, 2024